Tennessee, session 114, HB0205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-104, is amended by adding
the following language under the designation "Class II Pastoral River Areas":
Beaverdam Creek – The segment of Beaverdam Creek beginning with the
confluence of Brush Fork and Piney Fork in Hickman County and ending with the
confluence of Beaverdam Creek and Duck River in Hickman County.
Duck River – The segment of the river lying within Hickman county.
Lick Creek – The segment of the river beginning with the confluence of North
Fork Lick Creek and South Fork Lick Creek in Williamson County and ending with the
confluence of Lick Creek and Duck River in Hickman County.
Piney River – The segment of the river beginning with the confluence of West
Piney River and East Piney River in Dickson County and ending with the confluence of
Piney River and Duck River in Hickman County.
Swan Creek – The segment of Swan Creek beginning with the confluence of Dry
Branch and Swan Creek in Hickman County and ending with the confluence of Swan
Creek and Duck River in Hickman County.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-108(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the phrase "that segment of Duck River" and replacing it with "the segment of any
river".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0205
001786
- 1 -